New York, session 2025-2026, S1040.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. For the purposes of this section, "disabled veteran" shall 2 mean a veteran who is certified by the United States veterans' adminis- 3 tration or a military department as entitled to receive disability 4 payments upon the certification of such veterans' administration or a 5 military department for a disability incurred by the veteran in the 6 course of their service. 7 § 2. The state university of New York's board of trustees shall adopt 8 a policy requiring all state university of New York, city university of 9 New York, college, and community college campuses that offer membership 10 programs to the general public for the use of fitness and aquatic facil- 11 ities, to permit disabled veterans to obtain a membership for the use of 12 fitness and aquatic facilities upon the same terms and conditions as 13 apply to the general public, but without payment of any fees or other 14 charges. Such membership shall be granted upon the presentation of 15 documentation confirming disabled veteran status at the time of applica- 16 tion or any time after such membership has been granted. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03049-01-5